Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2843.01
Repackage, defined.

Repackage means the act of taking a drug product from the container in which it was distributed by the manufacturer and placing it into a different container without further manipulation of the drug. Repackaging also includes the act of placing the contents of multiple containers, such as vials, of the same finished drug product into one container so long as the container does not contain other ingredients or is not further manipulated to change the drug product in any way.

Laws 2017, LB166, § 12.